Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Public Defense Services Commission, for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the
following purposes:
(1) Appellate Division.....................  $ 18,194,890
(2) Professional services.................  $ 276,304,521
(3) Contract and Business
Services Division....................... $ 4,423,808
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Public Defense Services
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Professional services................. $ 4,244,845
(2) Contract and Business
Services Division....................... $ 709,468
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 30, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5033 (HB 5033-A) Page 2